Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2155HH (1) 91 je/jh H.F. 153 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Direct the Iowa state university of 3 science and technology and the university of northern Iowa to 4 reestablish menâs baseball teams that qualify for participation 5 in the national collegiate athletic association and to take all 6 steps necessary to pursue such participation. 7